Illinois, session 104th, HB1825.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 5-2 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/5-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 5-2)7    Sec. 5-2. When accountability exists. A person is legally 8accountable for the conduct of another when:9        (a) having a mental state described by the statute 10    defining the offense, he or she causes another to perform 11    the conduct, and the other person in fact or by reason of 12    legal incapacity lacks such a mental state;13        (b) the statute defining the offense makes him or her 14    so accountable; or15        (c) either before or during the commission of an 16    offense, and with the intent to promote or facilitate that 17    commission, he or she solicits, aids, abets, agrees, or 18    attempts to aid that other person in the planning or 19    commission of the offense; or .20        (d) acting as an aggressor as provided in Section 7-4, 21    he or she causes another to use force in defense of himself 22    or another under Section 7-1 and that use of force is the 23    proximate cause of injury to a third party.   HB1825- 2 -LRB104 09228 RLC 19285 b1    When 2 or more persons engage in a common criminal design 2or agreement, any acts in the furtherance of that common 3design committed by one party are considered to be the acts of 4all parties to the common design or agreement and all are 5equally responsible for the consequences of those further 6acts. Mere presence at the scene of a crime does not render a 7person accountable for an offense; a person's presence at the 8scene of a crime, however, may be considered with other 9circumstances by the trier of fact when determining 10accountability.11    A person is not so accountable, however, unless the 12statute defining the offense provides otherwise, if:13        (1) he or she is a victim of the offense committed;14        (2) the offense is so defined that his or her conduct 15    was inevitably incident to its commission; or16        (3) before the commission of the offense, he or she 17    terminates his or her effort to promote or facilitate that 18    commission and does one of the following: (i) wholly 19    deprives his or her prior efforts of effectiveness in that 20    commission, (ii) gives timely warning to the proper law 21    enforcement authorities, or (iii) otherwise makes proper 22    effort to prevent the commission of the offense.23(Source: P.A. 96-710, eff. 1-1-10.)